Utah statutes.
53A-15-101.5.   Concurrent enrollment instruction in Mandarin Chinese.
(1) (a)  As used in this section, "category IV languages" means those
languages designated the most difficult to learn by the Defense Language
Institute as provided in training to members of the United States Military.
(b)  The Legislature recognizes:
(i)  the importance of students acquiring skills in foreign languages in order
for them to successfully compete in a global society; and
(ii)  that the acquisition of category IV languages, such as Mandarin Chinese,
Arabic, Korean, and Japanese, by students in the state's public schools
requires extended sequences of study to acquire useful proficiency in
listening, speaking, reading, and writing.
(2) (a)  As a component of the concurrent enrollment program authorized under
Section 53A-15-101, the State Board of Education and the State Board of
Regents, in consultation with the Utah Education Network, may develop and
implement a concurrent enrollment course of study in the category IV language
of Mandarin Chinese.
(b)  The course shall be taught over EDNET, the state's two-way interactive
system for video and audio, to high school juniors and seniors in the state's
public education system.
(3) (a)  The concurrent enrollment course in Mandarin Chinese authorized in
Subsection (2) may use paraprofessionals in the classroom who:
(i)  are fluent in Mandarin Chinese; and
(ii)  can provide reinforcement and tutoring to students on days and at times
when they are not receiving instruction over EDNET under Subsection (2)(b).
(b)  The State Board of Education, through the State Superintendent of Public
Instruction, and professors who teach Chinese in the state system of higher
education shall jointly ensure that the paraprofessionals are fluent in
Mandarin Chinese.
(4)  The State Board of Education and the State Board of Regents shall make
joint rules on the concurrent enrollment course authorized under this section
in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act,
to include:
(a)  notification to school districts on the times and places of the course
offerings; and
(b)  instructional materials for the course.
(5)  Students who successfully complete the concurrent enrollment course
offered under this section shall receive tuition reimbursement for a
sequential Mandarin Chinese course they successfully complete at an
institution within the state system of higher education under rules made by
the State Board of Regents in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah
Administrative Rulemaking Act.
(6)  The State Board of Education and the State Board of Regents shall jointly
track and monitor the Mandarin Chinese language program and may expand the
program to include other category IV languages, subject to student demand for
the courses and available resources.
